Illinois, session 104th, SB3432.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Revenue Law of the Civil 5Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by adding Section 62505-817 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2505/2505-817 new)8    Sec. 2505-817. Living wage study.9    (a) As used in this Section:10    "Affordable housing" means that the person is non-housing 11burdened. 12    "Decent standard of living" means sufficient access to 13food, water, affordable housing, education, health care, 14transportation, clothing, and other essential needs, including 15provisions for unexpected events. 16    "Living wage" means the remuneration received for a 17standard workweek by a worker in a particular place sufficient 18to afford a decent standard of living for the worker and the 19worker's family.20    "Non-housing burdened" means that the household spends not 21more than 30% of its gross income on housing costs. 22    (b) Subject to appropriation, the Department shall conduct 23a study to determine the living wage in this State and shall   SB3432- 2 -LRB104 18835 HLH 34107 b1make recommendations concerning how to increase the minimum 2wage to ensure residents of this State earn a living wage. The 3Department may coordinate with a university in this State to 4conduct the study.5    (c) No later than July 1, 2027, the Department shall 6submit a report containing its findings and recommendations 7under subsection (a) to the Governor and the General Assembly.8    (d)  This Section is repealed on January 1, 2028.